Georgia, session 2025_26, HB386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Back to School Relief Act."
SECTION 2.
Code Section 48-8-3 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to exemptions from
sales and use taxes, is amended in paragraph (75) by revising subparagraph (A) and adding
a new subparagraph to read as follows:
"(75)(A) The sale of eligible property. The exemption provided by this paragraph
applies only to sales occurring during the period commencing at 12:01 A.M. on July 30,
H. B. 386
- 1 -

LC 59 0097
2016, the last Thursday in the month of July and concluding at 12:00 Midnight on July
31, 2016 the following Sunday."
"(D) This paragraph shall stand repealed and reserved on December 31, 2028."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 386
- 2 -